Washington statutes.
RCW 41.48.090

Rules and regulations.

The governor shall make and publish such rules and regulations, not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter, as he or she finds necessary or appropriate to the efficient administration of the functions with which he or she is charged under this chapter.

[ 2012 c 117 s 80; 1951 c 184 s 10.]